sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Adaptéry: Audio a video káblové adaptéry a spojky; Adaptéry pamäťových kariet; USB adaptéry
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Προσαρμογείς: Προσαρμογείς & συζεύκτες καλωδίων ήχου & βίντεο; Προσαρμογείς κάρτας μνήμης; Προσαρμογείς USB
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Adapters: Audio- en videoadapters; Geheugenkaartadapters; USB-adapters
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อะแดปเตอร์: ตัวแปลงและหัวต่อสาย AV; อะแดปเตอร์การ์ดหน่วยความจำ; อะแดปเตอร์ USB
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 어댑터: 오디오 및 비디오 케이블 어댑터/커플러; 메모리 카드 어댑터; USB 어댑터
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Adapterek: Audio- és videokábel-adapterek és -csatlakozók; Memóriakártya-adapterek; USB-adapterek
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Adaptrar: Ljud- och grafikadaptrar; Minnesadaptrar; USB-adaptrar
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Adaptateurs: Adaptateurs et coupleurs de câbles audio et vidéo; Adaptateurs de carte mémoire; Adaptateurs USB
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Adattatori: Adattatori e accoppiatori audio e video; Adattatori di schede di memoria; Adattatori USB
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Адаптори: Преходници и конектори за аудио- и видеокабели; Адаптери за карти памет; USB адаптери
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Adaptadores: Adaptadores de áudio e vídeo; Adaptadores de cartão de memória; Adaptadores USB
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Adaptoare: Adaptoare și cuplaje pentru cabluri audio și video; Adaptoare pentru carduri de memorie; Adaptoare USB
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > アダプター: AVアダプター; メモリーカードアダプター; USBアダプター
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Адаптеры: Адаптеры и соединители для аудио- и видеокабелей; Адаптеры для карт памяти; USB-адаптеры
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Adapter: Audio/Video-Adapter; Speicheradapter; USB-Adapter
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Adaptere: Adaptere og tilkobling for lyd- og videokabler; Minnekortadaptere; USB-adaptere
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Adaptörler: Ses ve Video Adaptörleri; Bellek Kartı Adaptörleri; USB Adaptörler
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Adapterit: AV-kaapeleiden adapterit ja kytkimet; Muistikorttiadapterit; USB-adapterit
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Adaptadores: Adaptadores e acopladores de cabo áudio e vídeo; Adaptadores de cartão de memória; Adaptadores USB
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Adapterji: Adapterji in spojke za avdio in video kable; Adapterji za pomnilniške kartice; Adapterji USB
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 适配器: 音频/视频电缆适配器/耦合器; 存储卡配件; USB 适配器
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Adapteriai: Garso ir vaizdo kabelių adapteriai ir jungtys; Atminties kortelių adapteriai; USB adapteriai
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Bộ điều hợp: Đầu nối và bộ chuyển đổi cáp âm thanh & video; Bộ chuyển đổi thẻ nhớ; Bộ chuyển đổi USB
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Adaptery: Adaptery audio i wideo; Adaptery kart pamięci; Adaptery USB
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Adapteri: Adapteri i spojnice za audio i video kabele; Adapteri za memorijske kartice; USB adapteri
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Adaptadores: Adaptadores de audio y vídeo; Adaptadores de tarjetas de memoria; Adaptadores USB
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 變壓器: AV 端子轉接線/轉接頭; 記憶卡轉接器; USB 轉接頭
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Adaptere: Lyd- og videoadaptere; Hukommelseskortadaptere; USB-adaptere
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Adapters: Audio & Video Cable Adapters & Couplers; Memory Card Adapters; USB Adapters
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Adaptéry: Audio a video adaptéry a kabelové spojky; Adaptéry pro paměťové karty; Karty rozhraní USB